Louisiana, session 2026, HB1057.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1307(C) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1307. Application by mail
* * *
C. If the applicant is a member of the United States Service or resides
outside the United States, he may use the federal postcard application or an
application electronically transmitted by the registrar or secretary of state, and the
application shall be received by the registrar no later than 4:30 p.m. on the day
before the election. Such application shall be valid for a period extending at least
one year two years from the date the application is received in the office of the
registrar of voters; such period shall include at least one regularly scheduled federal
general election. If the registrar rejects the application of an applicant who is a
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1057 ENROLLED
member of the United States Service or resides outside the United States, the
registrar shall provide the applicant with written reasons for the rejection.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.